Utah statutes.
23-19-14.   Persons residing in certain institutions authorized to fish without license.

(1)  The Division of Wildlife Resources shall permit a person to fish without a license if:

(a) (i)  the person resides in:

(A)  the Utah State  Developmental Center in American Fork;

(B)  the state hospital;

(C)  a veteran's hospital;

(D)  a veteran's nursing home;

(E)  a mental health center;

(F)  an intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded;

(G)  a group home licensed by the Department of Human Services and operated under contract with the Division of Services for People with Disabilities;

(H)  a group home or other community-based placement licensed by the Department of Human Services and operated under contract with the Division of Juvenile Justice Services;

(I)  a private residential facility for at-risk youth licensed by the Department of Human Services; or

(J)  another similar institution approved by the division; or

(ii)  the person is a youth who participates in a work camp operated by the Division of Juvenile Justice Services;

(b)  the person is properly supervised by a representative of the institution; and

(c)  the institution obtains from the division a certificate of registration that specifies:

(i)  the date and place where the person will fish; and

(ii)  the name of the institution's representative who will supervise the person fishing.

(2)  The institution must apply for the certificate of registration at least 10 days before the fishing outing.

(3) (a)  An institution that receives a certificate of registration authorizing at-risk youth to fish shall provide instruction to the youth on fishing laws and regulations.

(b)  The division shall provide educational materials to the institution to assist it in complying with Subsection (3)(a).

